Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB789.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4301 of Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4301. Purpose.This chapter authorizes the establishment of a property assessed clean energy program in the Commonwealth to ensure that owners of agricultural, commercial and industrial properties can obtain low-cost, long-term financing for energy efficiency, electric vehicle charging infrastructure, indoor air quality, resiliency improvement, water conservation and renewable energy projects.Section 2. The definition of "qualified project" in section 4302 of Title 12 is amended and the section is amended by adding 123456789101112131415161718 a definition to read:§ 4302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Electric vehicle charging infrastructure project." The addition of a facility or equipment that is used to charge a battery or other energy storage device of a vehicle that is fully or partially powered by electricity.* * *"Qualified project." The installation or modification of a permanent improvement fixed to a qualifying commercial property that is a clean energy project, electric vehicle charging infrastructure project, resiliency improvement project, indoor air quality project, water conservation project or alternative energy system and the installation is performed by a qualified party in a district. The term includes installation of alternative energy-generating equipment affixed to the land or building.* * *Section 3. Section 4305 of Title 12 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4305. Scope of work.* * *(c) Notification for alternative fuels tax.--(1) A municipality or county that approves an electric vehicle charging infrastructure project by an alternative fuel dealer-user as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 9002 (relating to definitions) under a program shall send a notice to the 20250HB0789PN0813 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Revenue upon completion of the project.(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) shall include a description of the electric vehicle charging infrastructure project, the date of completion of the electric vehicle charging infrastructure project and contact information for the commercial property owner.(3) Upon receipt of the notice required under paragraph (1), the Department of Revenue shall ensure that any tax amount required to be paid to the Department of Revenue under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9004(d) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) is collected for the charging of electric vehicles using facilities or equipment completed under the electric vehicle charging infrastructure project.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0789PN0813 - 3 - 1234567891011121314